Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1306
Venue; death occurring in another county or state.

If any person shall give any mortal blow or administer any poison to another, in any county within this state, with intent to kill, and the party so stricken or poisoned thereof shall die in any other county or state, the person giving such mortal blow or administering such poison may be tried and convicted of murder or manslaughter, as the case may be, in the county where such mortal blow was given or poison administered.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 545, p. 844;

R.S.1913, § 9029;

C.S.1922, § 10053;

C.S.1929, § 29-1306;

R.S.1943, § 29-1306.

Venue of a homicide may be established by circumstantial evidence. Hawkins v. State, 60 Neb. 380, 83 N.W. 198 (1900).